Hawaii, session 2026, SB2759.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The board of land and natural resources shall extend the term of all leases of public lands to the United States military that expire in 2028, 2029, 2030, or 2031 for a period of five years, to allow the military additional time to complete and submit an environmental impact statement pursuant to chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the leased public lands; provided that the accepting authority of the final statement shall be the governor, or the governor's authorized representative. (b) For the purposes of this section: "Environmental impact statement" has the same meaning as defined in section 343-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes. "Lease" has the same meaning as defined in section 171-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes. "Public lands" has the same meaning as defined in section 171-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________